Utah statutes.
62A-1-111.   Department authority.
The department may, in addition to all other authority and responsibility
granted to it by law:
(1)  adopt rules, not inconsistent with law, as the department may consider
necessary or desirable for providing social services to the people of this
state;
(2)  establish and manage client trust accounts in the department's
institutions and community programs, at the request of the client or the
client's legal guardian or representative, or in accordance with federal law;
(3)  purchase, as authorized or required by law, services that the department
is responsible to provide for legally eligible persons;
(4)  conduct adjudicative proceedings for clients and providers in accordance
with the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;
(5)  establish eligibility standards for its  programs, not inconsistent with
state or federal law or regulations;
(6)  take necessary steps, including legal action, to recover money or the
monetary value of services provided to a recipient who was not eligible;
(7)  set and collect fees for its  services;
(8)  license agencies, facilities, and programs, except as otherwise allowed,
prohibited, or limited by law;
(9)  acquire, manage, and dispose of any real or personal property needed or
owned by the department, not inconsistent with state law;
(10)  receive gifts, grants, devises, and donations; gifts, grants, devises,
donations, or the proceeds thereof, may be credited to the program designated
by the donor, and may be used for the purposes requested by the donor, as long
as the request conforms to state and federal policy; all donated funds shall
be considered private, nonlapsing funds and may be invested under guidelines
established by the state treasurer;
(11)  accept and employ volunteer labor or services; the department is
authorized to reimburse volunteers for necessary expenses, when the department
considers that reimbursement to be appropriate;
(12)  carry out the responsibility assigned in the Workforce Services Plan by
the State Council on Workforce Services;
(13)  carry out the responsibility assigned by Section 9-4-802 with respect to
coordination of services for the homeless;
(14)  carry out the responsibility assigned by Section 62A-5a-105 with respect
to coordination of services for students with a disability;
(15)  provide training and educational opportunities for its  staff;
(16)  collect child support payments and any other money due to the
department;
(17)  apply the provisions of Title 78B, Chapter  12, Utah Child Support Act,
to parents  whose child lives out of the home in a department licensed or
certified setting;
(18)  establish policy  and procedures in  cases where the department is given
custody of a minor by the juvenile court pursuant to  Section 78A-6-117; any
policy and procedures  shall include:
(a)  designation of interagency teams for each juvenile court district in the
state;
(b)  delineation of assessment criteria and procedures;
(c)  minimum requirements, and timeframes, for the development and
implementation of a collaborative service plan for each minor placed in
department custody; and
(d)  provisions for submittal of the plan and periodic progress reports to the
court;
(19)  carry out the responsibilities assigned to it  by statute;
(20)  examine and audit the expenditures of any public funds provided to local
substance abuse authorities, local mental health authorities, local area
agencies on aging, and any person, agency, or organization that contracts with
or receives funds from those authorities or agencies.  Those local
authorities, area agencies, and any person or entity that contracts with or
receives funds from those authorities or area agencies, shall provide the
department with any information the department considers necessary.  The
department is further authorized to issue directives resulting from any
examination or audit to local authorities, area agencies, and persons or
entities that contract with or receive funds from those authorities with
regard to any public funds.  If the department determines that it is necessary
to withhold funds from a local mental health authority or local substance
abuse authority based on failure to comply with state or federal law, policy,
or contract provisions, it may take steps necessary to ensure continuity of
services.  For purposes of this Subsection (20) "public funds" means the same
as that term is defined in Section 62A-15-102; and
(21)  pursuant to Subsection 62A-2-106(1)(d), accredit one or more agencies
and persons to provide intercountry adoption services.
